vi: Điều chỉnh tiêu cự: Tự động; Xe lăn thủ công; Khác
ro-RO: Ajustare focalizare: Auto; Manual; Altele
sl-SI: Prilagoditev ostrenja: Samodejno; Ročno; Drugo
ko: 초점 조정: 자동; 수동; 기타
zh-TW: 焦點調節: 自動; 手動; 其他
da: Fokusjustering: Auto; Manuel; Andet
nb: Fokusjustering: Auto; Manuell; Annet
de: Fokuseinstellung: Auto; Manuell; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 焦点调节: 自动; 手动; 其他
sk-SK: Úprava zaostrenia: Automatický; Manuálny; Iné
es: Ajuste de enfoque: Automático; Manual; Otros
hu: Fókusz beállítása: Automata; Manuális; Egyéb
en: Focus adjustment: Auto; Manual; Other
pt-PT: Ajuste de foco: Auto; Manual; Outro
it: Regolazione della messa a fuoco: Automatica; Manuale; Altro
ja: 焦点調節: 自動; 手動; その他
fi: Tarkennuksen säätö: Automaattinen; Manuaalinen; Muu
fr: Ajustement du focus: Automatique; Manuel; Autre
th: การปรับโฟกัส: อัตโนมัติ; มือเข็น; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Коригиране на фокуса: Авто; Ръчно; Други
el: Ρύθμιση εστίασης: Αυτόματος; Χειροκίνητο; Άλλο
hr-HR: Prilagođavanje izoštravanja: Automatsko; Ručno; Ostalo
ru: Регулировка фокуса: Авто; Ручной; Другой
pl: Regulacja ostrości: Automatyczna; Ręczny; Inne
lt-LT: Fokuso reguliavimas: Automatinis; Rankinis; Kita
cs: Nastavení zaostření: Automatický; Ruční; Jiné
sv: Fokusjustering: Auto; Manuell; Övrigt
pt-BR: Ajuste de foco: Automático; Manual; Outro
nl: Scherpstellingsaanpassing: Auto; Handmatig; Andere
tr: Odak Ayarı: Otomatik; Manuel; Diğer